North Carolina, session 2025, SB727.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 108D-1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108D-1. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Chapter:
…
(6e) Commercial plan. – As defined in G.S. 58-93-5.
…
(31e) Provider-led entity or PLE. – As defined in G.S. 58-93-5.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 108D-45 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108D-45. Number and nature of contracts for standard benefit plans.
(a) The For the initial standard benefit plan contracts required under G.S. 108D-65(6),
the number and nature of the contracts for standard benefit plans required under G.S. 108D-65(6)
those contracts shall be as follows:
(1) Four contracts between the Division of Health Benefits and PHPs to provide
coverage to Medicaid recipients statewide.
(2) Up to 12 contracts between the Division of Health Benefits and PLEs for
coverage of regions specified by the Division of Health Benefits pursuant to
G.S. 108D-65(2). Regional contracts shall be in addition to the four statewide
contracts required under subdivision (1) of this section. Each regional contract
shall provide coverage throughout the entire region for the Medicaid services
required by G.S. 108D-35. A PLE may bid for more than one regional
contract, provided that the regions are contiguous.
(3) Repealed by Session Laws 2023-134, s. 9E.22(i), effective October 3, 2023.
(4) Initial capitated PHP contracts may be awarded on staggered terms of three to
five years in duration to ensure against gaps in coverage that may result from
termination of a contract by the PHP or the State.
(b) For any standard benefit contracts required under G.S. 108D-65(6) that are awarded
subsequent to the initial standard benefit plan contracts, the number and nature of those contracts
shall be as follows:
(1) Four contracts between the Division of Health Benefits and commercial plans
to provide coverage to Medicaid recipients statewide.
*S727-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Up to four contracts between the Division of Health Benefits and PLEs for
coverage of regions specified by the Division of Health Benefits pursuant to
G.S. 108D-65(2) or for statewide coverage, in accordance with all of the
following:
a. The contracts under this subdivision shall be in addition to the four
statewide contracts required under subdivision (1) of this subsection.
b. Each regional contract under this subdivision shall provide coverage
throughout the entire region for the Medicaid services required by
G.S. 108D-35.
c. A PLE may bid for more than one regional contract, provided that the
regions are contiguous.
d. If less than four PLEs submit a timely response meeting the minimum
requirements of the RFP to procure standard benefit plan contracts, as
determined by the Division of Health Benefits, then all PLEs that
submitted a timely response meeting the minimum requirements of the
RFP shall be awarded a standard benefit plan contract, either regional
or statewide, based on the area proposed to be served in the RFP
response.
e. If four or more PLEs submit a timely response meeting the minimum
requirements of the RFP to procure standard benefit plan contracts, as
determined by the Division of Health Benefits, then the Division of
Health Benefits shall award four standard benefit plan contracts to
PLEs, either regional or statewide, based on the area proposed to be
served in the RFP response."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 727-First Edition